test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-laitw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - laitõ: # Verb 20 'eng /est laita/fin' - full paradigm
     laitõ+V+Inf: laitõ
     laitõ+V+Ger: laitõs
     laitõ+V+Ger: laitõs
     laitõ+V+Sup: lāitam
     laitõ+V+Sup+Ine: lāitamõs
     laitõ+V+Sup+Ela: lāitamõst
     laitõ+V+Sup+Tra: lāitamõks
     laitõ+V+Sup+Abe: lāitamõt
     laitõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lāitab
     laitõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: lāitat
     laitõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lāitabõd
     laitõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lāitiz
     laitõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [lāitizt, lāitiztõ]
     laitõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [lāitizt, lāitiztõ]
     laitõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: lait
     laitõ+V+Cond+Sg3: lāitaks
     laitõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: lāita
     laitõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: laitõ
     laitõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: lāitagid
     laitõ+V+Jus+Sg3: lāitag
     laitõ+V+QuoSg3: lāitaji
     laitõ+V+ActPrfPrc: laitõn
     laitõ+V+PssPrfPrc: laitõd
